test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_I_miskweyaab_gt-glossing.yaml
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinsbaniin
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinsbaniing
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinsbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: nmiskweyaabiimshinaa
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gmiskweyaabiimshinaa
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gmiskweyaabiimshiwaa
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: miskweyaabiimshiwaa
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: miskweyaabiimshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: nmiskweyaabiimshiba
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmiskweyaabiimshidig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gmiskweyaabiimshiba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiimshidig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: miskweyaabiimshiba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiimshidig
     X+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: miskweyaabiimshiba
     X+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiimshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: nmiskweyaabiimshan
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: nmiskweyaabiimshing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: nmiskweyaabiimshan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: gmiskweyaabiimshan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gmiskweyaabiimshing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gmiskweyaabiimshan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: miskweyaabiimshan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: miskweyaabiimshing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: miskweyaabiimshan
     X+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: miskweyaabiimshan
     X+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: miskweyaabiimshing
     X+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: miskweyaabiimshan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: nmiskweyaabiimnaanba
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmiskweyaabiimnaandig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gmiskweyaabiimnaanba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiimnaandig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gmiskweyaabiimwaaba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiimwaadig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: miskweyaabiimwaaba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiimwaadig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: miskweyaabiimniwba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiimniwdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: nmiskweyaabiimnaanin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: nmiskweyaabiimnaaning
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: nmiskweyaabiimnaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gmiskweyaabiimnaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gmiskweyaabiimnaaning
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gmiskweyaabiimnaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gmiskweyaabiimwaan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gmiskweyaabiimwaang
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gmiskweyaabiimwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: miskweyaabiimwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: miskweyaabiimwaang
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: miskweyaabiimwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+3+4+4: miskweyaabiimniwan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: miskweyaabiimniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Pl: miskweyaabiimniwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Prt+4: nmiskweyaabiimbaniin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: nmiskweyaabiimbaniing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: nmiskweyaabiimbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Prt+4: gmiskweyaabiimbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gmiskweyaabiimbaniing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gmiskweyaabiimbaniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Prt+4: miskweyaabiimbaniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiimbaniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiimbaniin
     X+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Prt+4: miskweyaabiimbaniin
     X+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiimbaniing
     X+mskweyaap+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiimbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmiskweyaabiishnaanba
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmiskweyaabiishnaandig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmiskweyaabiishnaanba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiishnaandig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmiskweyaabiishwaaba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiishwaadig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: miskweyaabiishwaaba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiishwaadig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+3+4+Prt: miskweyaabiishniwba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiishniwdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmiskweyaabiishnaanin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmiskweyaabiishnaaning
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmiskweyaabiishnaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmiskweyaabiishnaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmiskweyaabiishnaaning
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmiskweyaabiishnaanin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmiskweyaabiishwaan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmiskweyaabiishwaang
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmiskweyaabiishwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+2+Pl+4: miskweyaabiishwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: miskweyaabiishwaang
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: miskweyaabiishwaan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+3+4+4: miskweyaabiishniwan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+3+4+Loc: miskweyaabiishniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+3+4+Pl: miskweyaabiishniwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+4: nmiskweyaabiishbaniin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmiskweyaabiishbaniing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmiskweyaabiishbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+4: gmiskweyaabiishbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmiskweyaabiishbaniing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmiskweyaabiishbaniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+4: miskweyaabiishbaniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiishbaniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiishbaniin
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+4: miskweyaabiishbaniin
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiishbaniing
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiishbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmiskweyaabiinaanbaniin
     1+mskweyaap+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmiskweyaabiinaanbaniing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinaanbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmiskweyaabiinaanbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinaanbaniing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinaanbaniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmiskweyaabiiwaabniin
     2+mskweyaap+NI+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmiskweyaabiiwaabniing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmiskweyaabiiwaabniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+2+Pl+Prt+4: miskweyaabiiwaabniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiiwaabniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiiwaabniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+3+4+Prt+4: miskweyaabiinwibniin
     3+mskweyaap+NI+3+4+Prt+Loc: miskweyaabiinwibniing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+3+4+Prt+Pl: miskweyaabiinwibniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: mskweyaabiinyshibniin
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: mskweyaabiinyshibniing
     mskweyaap+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: mskweyaabiinyshibniin
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: mskweyaabiinsshibniin
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: mskweyaabiinsshibniing
     mskweyaap+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: mskweyaabiinsshibniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinymishnaa
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinsmishnaa
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinymishnaa
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinymishwaa
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsmishnaa
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsmishwaa
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: miskweyaabiinymishwaa
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: miskweyaabiinymishni
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: miskweyaabiinsmishwaa
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: miskweyaabiinsmishni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: nmiskweyaabiinymishba
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinymishdig
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: nmiskweyaabiinsmishba
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinsmishdig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gmiskweyaabiinymishba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinymishdig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gmiskweyaabiinsmishba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsmishdig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: miskweyaabiinymishba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiinymishdig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: miskweyaabiinsmishba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiinsmishdig
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: miskweyaabiinymishba
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiinymishdig
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: miskweyaabiinsmishba
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiinsmishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+4: nmiskweyaabiinymishan
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: nmiskweyaabiinymishing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinymishan
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+4: nmiskweyaabiinsmishan
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: nmiskweyaabiinsmishing
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinsmishan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+4: gmiskweyaabiinymishan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinymishing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinymishan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+4: gmiskweyaabiinsmishan
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gmiskweyaabiinsmishing
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsmishan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+4: miskweyaabiinymishan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: miskweyaabiinymishing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: miskweyaabiinymishan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+4: miskweyaabiinsmishan
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: miskweyaabiinsmishing
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: miskweyaabiinsmishan
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+4: miskweyaabiinymishan
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: miskweyaabiinymishing
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: miskweyaabiinymishan
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+4: miskweyaabiinsmishan
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: miskweyaabiinsmishing
     X+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: miskweyaabiinsmishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: nmiskweyaabiinyminaanba
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinyminaandig
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: nmiskweyaabiinsminaanba
     1+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmiskweyaabiinsminaandig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gmiskweyaabiinyminaanba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinyminaandig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gmiskweyaabiinymiwaaba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinymiwaadig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gmiskweyaabiinsminaanba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsminaandig
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gmiskweyaabiinsmiwaaba
     2+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmiskweyaabiinsmiwaadig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: miskweyaabiinymiwaaba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiinymiwaadig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: miskweyaabiinyminwiba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiinyminwidig
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: miskweyaabiinsmiwaaba
     3+mskweyaap+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: miskweyaabiinsmiwaadig
